Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1720
Bonds and obligations; paid in full; net income; distribution.

After all bonds or other evidence of indebtedness issued by the authority have been paid in full, and after the authority has set aside a reasonable reserve for working capital, maintenance, and necessary improvements of its facilities, the authority shall annually distribute all of its net income between the city and county in proportion to the area contributed by the city and county respectively for the use of the authority.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 20, p. 112.